src/phonology/nds-phon.twolc
!2019-01-18a!!! niamen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __váldit/ottaa/take__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL1S%>t
!2019-01-18a!!!€ ni0mØ%>t
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4b %{eiao%}:i "
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eiao%}:i <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Second part %{aeØ%}:0"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:0 <=> i _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! dreapen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __deaivvadit/tavata/meet__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL1S%>t
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dri0pØ%>t
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4c %{eio%}:i"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eio%}:i <=> _ %{a0o%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Second part %{a0o%}:0"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{a0o%}:0 <=> i _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! spreaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __hupmat/puhua/speak__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ spr%{eio%}%{a0o%}k%^ABL1S%>t
!2019-01-18a!!!€ spri0k0%>t
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 5a %{iae%}:i"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iae%}:i <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Second part %{aeØ%}:0"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:0 <=> i _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! giaven+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __addit/antaa/give__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ g%{iae%}%{aeØ%}v%^ABL1S%>t
!2019-01-18a!!!€ gi0v0%>t
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 5b"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eia%}:i <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Second part %{aeØ%}:0"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:0 <=> i _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! steaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __čugget/pistää/stab__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ st%{eia%}%{aeØ%}k%^ABL1S%>t
!2019-01-18a!!!€ sti0k0%>t
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 1 %{eiØ%}:e"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eiØ%}:e <=> _ %{yaØ%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 1 %{yaØ%}:y"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{yaØ%}:y <=> e _ Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! ryden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __riidet/ratsastaa/ride__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!€ reyd0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ re%{yaØ%}d0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 2a %{eouü%}:o" 
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eouü%}:o <=> _ %{0eua%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 2a %{0eua%}:u" 
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{0eua%}:u <=> o _ Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! beden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __bivdit/pyytää/ask__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!€ boud0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bo%{0eua%}d0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 2b %{uüo%}:o"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{uüo%}:o <=> _ %{uaØ%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 2b %{uaØ%}:u"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{uaØ%}:u <=> o _ Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! krupen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __čákŋat/ryömiä/creep__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!€ kroup0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kro%{uaØ%}p0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 3a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iua%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! drinken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __juhkat/juoda/drink__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!€ drunk0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{iua%}nk0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 3b and 3c"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eoa%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! helpen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __veahkehit/auttaa/help__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!€ holp0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ h%{eoa%}lp0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) %{iaeo%}:a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iaeo%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) %{aeØ%}:e"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:e <=> a _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! niamen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __váldit/ottaa/take__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U
!2019-01-18a!!!€ naem0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U
!2019-01-18a!!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U
!2019-01-18a!!!$ na%{aeØ%}m0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) %{eiao%}:a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eiao%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) %{aeØ%}:e"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:e <=> i _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! dreapen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __deaivvadit/tavata/meet__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL2U
!2019-01-18a!!!€ draep0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4c %{eio%}:o"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eio%}:o <=> _ %{a0o%}: Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 4c :o"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{a0o%}:o <=> o _ Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! spreaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __hupmat/puhua/speak__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ spr%{eio%}%{a0o%}k%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!€ sprook0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 5a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) :a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iae%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 5a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) :e"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:e <=> e _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! giaven+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __addit/antaa/give__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ g%{iae%}%{aeØ%}v%^ABL2U
!2019-01-18a!!!€ gaevØ%>t
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 5b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) :a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eia%}:a <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 2 in class 5b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects) :e"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:e <=> a _ Cns %^ABL2U: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! steaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __čugget/pistää/stab__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ st%{eia%}%{aeØ%}k%^ABL2U
!2019-01-18a!!!€ staek0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 1 :e "
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eiØ%}:e <=> _ %{yaØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 1 :a "
!2019-01-18a!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2019-01-18a! %{yaØ%}:a <=> e _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! ryden+V+PrfPrc: __riidet/ratsastaa/ride__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ read0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ re%{yaØ%}d0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 2a :o" 
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eouü%}:o <=> _ %{0eua%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 2a :a" 
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{0eua%}:a <=> o _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! beden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: __bivdit/pyytää/ask__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ boad0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bo%{0eua%}d0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 2b :o"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{uüo%}:o <=> _ %{uaØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 2b :a "
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{uaØ%}:a <=> o _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! krupen+V+PrfPrc: __čákŋat/ryömiä/creep__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ kroap0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kro%{uaØ%}p0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2
!2019-01-18a!!!$ kro%{uaØ%}p0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 3a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iua%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! drinken+V+PrfPrt: __juhkat/juoda/drink__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ drunk0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{iua%}nk0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 3b and 3c"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eoa%}:u <=> _ Cns Cns %^ABL2: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! helpen+V+PrfPrt: __veahkehit/auttaa/help__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ holp0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ h%{eoa%}lp0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 4a"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{iaeo%}:o <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:a <=> o _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! niamen+V+PrfPrt: __váldit/ottaa/take__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ noam0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ na%{aeØ%}m0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 4b"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eiao%}:o <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a! %{aeØ%}:a <=> o _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! dreapen+V+PrfPrt: __deaivvadit/tavata/meet__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ droap0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ dro%{aeØ%}p0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Ablaut grade 3 in class 4c"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! %{eio%}:o <=> _ %{a0o%}: Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a! %{a0o%}:a <=> o _ Cns %^ABL3: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! spreaken+V+PrfPrt: __hupmat/puhua/speak__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ spr%{eio%}%{a0o%}k%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!€ sproak0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ spr%{eio%}%{a0o%}k%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ spr%{eio%}%{a0o%}k0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ spr%{eio%}%{a0o%}k%^ABL3%>en
!2019-01-18a!!!$ spro%{a0o%}k0%>en
!2019-01-18a!
